Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.190

Revolving funds.

Revolving funds shall not be created by law except to finance the operations of service units, or units set up to supply goods and services to other units or agencies. Such service units where created shall be self-supporting operations featuring continuous turnover of working capital. The regulations issued by the governor pursuant to this chapter shall prescribe the procedures to be employed by agencies in accounting and reporting for revolving funds and may provide for the keeping of such funds in the custody of the treasurer.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.88.190. Prior: 1959 c 328 s 19.]